test/src/morphology/Pron-mis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - mis: # pronouns 1 'eng /est mis/fin' - full paradigm
     mis+Pron+Sg+Nom: mis
     mis+Pron+Sg+Gen: mis
     mis+Pron+Sg+Par: [midā, mis]
     mis+Pron+Sg+Dat: missõn
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ins: missõks
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ill: missõ
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ela: missõst
